Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-826
Personal loans; duties of department.

(1) The department shall:

(a) Be responsible for obtaining proper administration of sections 8-815 to 8-829 and take or cause to be taken such lawful steps as may be necessary and appropriate for the enforcement thereof; and

(b) Arrange for investigation and examination of the papers and records, pertaining to loans made under section 8-820, for the purpose of discovering violations of sections 8-815 to 8-829 or securing information lawfully required under it.

(2) The Director of Banking and Finance may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out and obtain compliance with sections 8-815 to 8-829.

Laws 1965, c. 31, § 12, p. 218;

Laws 1978, LB 641, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 143.